Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1407] Collaboration with the center
for nursing. The University of Hawaii school of nursing and dental
hygiene, the state board of nursing, other schools of nursing within the State,
professional nursing organizations, employers in the healthcare industry, and
labor unions representing nurses and healthcare workers shall collaborate with
the center for nursing and provide workforce data to the center for nursing
when requested. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next